GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/flex-verb.lexc
! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
! TYPE:		lexc
! CONTENT:	German morphology: verb inflection
!
! AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller, XRCE
! DATE:		13-Jan-2003
! -------------------------------------------------------------------------


! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Fully regular verbs
LEXICON V_reg
					vflex/PresReg;	! spiel-, samm(e)l-
 < 0:%^V >				vflex/PastReg;	! spielt-, sammelt-
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/PPast;	! gespielt, gesammelt



! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/trunc
 @U.sep.on@@U.zu.off@@U.ge.off@			Trunc ;

! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
! infinitive
LEXICON vform/Inf	
 @U.ge.off@@U.sep.on@	vform/Inf_1 ;
 
LEXICON vform/Inf_1	
 @R.zu.on@+Izu				inv ;
 @U.zu.off@+Inf				inv ;
 @U.zu.off@+Inf^]+Noun+Neut		N_Sgs ;
 @U.zu.off@+Inf^]+Noun+Neut		Cp_s ;	! liebenswert; Ermessensfrage

! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
! present participle
LEXICON vform/PPres
 @U.ge.off@@U.sep.on@	vform/PPres_1 ;

LEXICON vform/PPres_1
 @R.zu.on@+PPrzu			inv ;
 @U.zu.off@+PPres			inv ;

 @U.zu.off@+PPres@C.un@^]+Adj		A_reg ;
 @R.zu.on@+PPrzu@C.un@^]+Adj		A_reg ;

! -------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past participle
LEXICON vform/PPast
 @U.zu.off@@U.sep.on@	vform/PPast_1 ;

LEXICON vform/PPast_1
 @U.ge.on@+PPast			inv ;

 @U.ge.on@+PPast@C.un@^]+Adj		A_reg ;
 @U.ge.on@+PPast@C.un@			}heit ;



! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! imperatives
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/ImpSg		
  @U.ge.off@@U.zu.off@@U.sep.off@+Imp+2P+Sg		FinVerb ;

LEXICON vform/ImpPl
  @U.ge.off@@U.zu.off@@U.sep.off@+Imp+2P+Pl		FinVerb ;


LEXICON FinVerb
  < %^ElV ( "^&":0 e:%' s 
      %+Pron:0 %+Pers:0 %+3P:0 %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+NomAcc:0  
    ) >							   inv ;


LEXICON vfin	
  @U.ge.off@@U.zu.off@	vfin_1 ;

LEXICON vfin_1
  @R.sep.on@+V2			inv ;		! weil er ankommt 
						! no attachment of "'s"
  @R.sep.off@+V1		FinVerb ;	! er kommt an
  @U.sep.any@			FinVerb ;	! (weil) er kommt

! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! present indicative OR subjunctive
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/1SgPres		+IndcSubj+1P+Sg+Pres	vfin;
!LEXICON vform/2SgPres		+IndcSubj+2P+Sg+Pres	vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPres		+IndcSubj+2P+Pl+Pres	vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPres		+IndcSubj+1P3P+Pl+Pres	vfin;

! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! present indicative
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/13SgPresInd	+Indc+1P3P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/1SgPresInd	+Indc+1P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2SgPresInd	+Indc+2P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/3SgPresInd	+Indc+3P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPresInd	+Indc+1P3P+Pl+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPresInd	+Indc+2P+Pl+Pres		vfin;


! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! present subjunctive
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/13SgPresKonj	+Subj+1P3P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2SgPresKonj	+Subj+2P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/3SgPresKonj	+Subj+3P+Sg+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPresKonj	+Subj+1P3P+Pl+Pres		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPresKonj	+Subj+2P+Pl+Pres		vfin;

! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! past indicative OR subjunctive
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/13SgPast		+IndcSubj+1P3P+Sg+Past	vfin;
LEXICON vform/2SgPast		+IndcSubj+2P+Sg+Past	vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPast		+IndcSubj+1P3P+Pl+Past	vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPast		+IndcSubj+2P+Pl+Past	vfin;

! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! past indicative
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/13SgPastInd	+Indc+1P3P+Sg+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2SgPastInd	+Indc+2P+Sg+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPastInd	+Indc+1P3P+Pl+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPastInd	+Indc+2P+Pl+Past		vfin;

! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
! past subjunctive
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON vform/13SgPastKonj	+Subj+1P3P+Sg+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2SgPastKonj	+Subj+2P+Sg+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/13PlPastKonj	+Subj+1P3P+Pl+Past		vfin;
LEXICON vform/2PlPastKonj	+Subj+2P+Pl+Past		vfin;




! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! infinitve and present tense all forms
LEXICON vflex/PresReg
					vform/Inf;		! (zu) biegen, heben
 < 0:d >				vform/PPres;		! biegend, hebend
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e >			vform/1SgPres;		! (ich) biege, hebe
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:s 0:t >	vform/2SgPresInd;	! (du) bieg(e)st, heb(e)st
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:s 0:t >		vform/2SgPresKonj;	! (du) biegest, hebest
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/3SgPresInd;	! (er) biegt, hebt
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e >			vform/3SgPresKonj;	! (er) biege, hebe
					vform/13PlPres;		! (wir,sie) lieben, raten, sammeln
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/2PlPresInd;	! (ihr) biegt, hebt
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:t >		vform/2PlPresKonj;	! (ihr) bieget, hebet
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^ImpE >		vform/ImpSg;		! bieg(e)! heb(e)!
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/ImpPl;		! biegt! hebt!
 < 0:%^V %^CpdE >			vform/trunc;		! bieg(e)-, heb(e)-

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! infinitive and present tense except 2nd/3rd Sg. Pres. Ind. and Impl Sg.
LEXICON vflex/PresIrreg
					vform/Inf;		! (zu) helfen, halten
 < 0:d >				vform/PPres;		! helfend, haltend
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e >			vform/1SgPres;		! (ich) helfe, halte
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:s 0:t >		vform/2SgPresKonj;	! (du) helfest, haltest
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e >			vform/3SgPresKonj;	! (er) helfe, halte
					vform/13PlPres;		! (wir, sie) helfen, halten
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/2PlPresInd;	! (ihr) helft, haltet
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:t >		vform/2PlPresKonj;	! (ihr) helfet, haltet
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t >		vform/ImpPl;		! haltet! helft!
 < 0:%^V %^CpdE >			vform/trunc;		! halt(e)-, ?helf(e)- 

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! present tense indicative 2nd/3rd singular
LEXICON vflex/Pres2
 < 0:%^%+ 0:s 0:t >		vform/3SgPresInd;	! (du) hilfst, hältst
 < 0:%^%+ 0:t >			vform/3SgPresInd;	! (er) hilft, hält

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! imperative singular
LEXICON vflex/ImpSg
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^ImpE >			vform/ImpSg;	! komm(e)! schau(e)! arbeit-e!

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, indicative AND subjunctive, weak (regular)
LEXICON vflex/PastReg	
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e >		vform/13SgPast;	! (ich, er) liebte, wollte, arbeitete
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:s 0:t>	vform/2SgPast;	! 
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:n >	vform/13PlPast;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:t >	vform/2PlPast;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, indicative, weak (regular)
LEXICON vflex/PastIndReg	
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e >		vform/13SgPastInd;	! (ich,er) brachte
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:s 0:t>	vform/2SgPastInd;	! 
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:n >	vform/13PlPastInd;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:t >	vform/2PlPastInd;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, subjunctive, weak (regular)
LEXICON vflex/PastKonjReg	
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e >		vform/13SgPastKonj;	! (ich) brächte
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:s 0:t>	vform/2SgPastKonj;	!
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:n >	vform/13PlPastKonj;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE 0:t 0:e 0:t >	vform/2PlPastKonj;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, indicative AND subjunctive, strong (irregular)
LEXICON vflex/PastStr
 < 0:%^%+ >				vform/13SgPastInd;	! (ich) ritt, schrieb
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e >				vform/13SgPastKonj;	! (ich) ritte, schriebe
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE2 0:s 0:t >		vform/2SgPast;		! (du) rittest, schrieb(e)st
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:n >			vform/13PlPast;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE2 0:t >		vform/2PlPast;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, indicative, strong
LEXICON vflex/PastIndStr
 < 0:%^%+ >				vform/13SgPastInd;	! (ich) fuhr, fand
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE2 0:s 0:t >		vform/2SgPastInd;	! (du) fuhr-st, fand-e-st
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:n >			vform/13PlPastInd;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:%^InsE2 0:t >		vform/2PlPastInd;	! (ihr) fuhr-t, fand-e-t

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense, subjunctive, strong
LEXICON vflex/PastKonjStr
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e >				vform/13SgPastKonj;	! (ich) führe, fände
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:s 0:t >			vform/2SgPastKonj;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:n >			vform/13PlPastKonj;
 < 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:t >			vform/2PlPastKonj;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! modals stem 1: present indicative singular
LEXICON vflex/ModSg
 < 0:%^%+ >				vform/13SgPresInd;	! (ich, er) will, weiß
 < 0:%^%+ 0:s 0:t >			vform/2SgPresInd;	! (du) willst, weißt

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! modals stem 2: infinitive, present indicatiev plural, present subjunctive
LEXICON vflex/ModInf
 				vform/Inf;
 < 0:d >			vform/PPres;
 				vform/13PlPres;
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e >		vform/13SgPresKonj;	! (ich) wolle, wisse
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:s 0:t >	vform/2SgPresKonj;	! (du)	wollest, wissest
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:t >		vform/2PlPresInd;
 < 0:%^V 0:%^%+ 0:e 0:t >	vform/2PlPresKonj;

! ------------------------------------------------------------------------
! irregular verbs
! ------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON V.sein	! da=sein 
  sein+Verb		vform/Inf;
  sein+Verb:seiend	vform/PPres;
  sein+Verb:sei		vform/ImpSg;
  sein+Verb:seid	vform/ImpPl;		
  sein+Verb:bin		vform/1SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb:sei		vform/13SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb:bist	vform/2SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb:seist	vform/2SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb:seiest	vform/2SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb:ist		vform/3SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb:sind	vform/13PlPresInd;
  sein+Verb:seien	vform/13PlPresKonj;
  sein+Verb:seid	vform/2PlPresInd;
  sein+Verb:seiet	vform/2PlPresKonj;
  sein+Verb:war		vflex/PastIndStr;
  sein+Verb:warest	vform/2SgPastInd;
  sein+Verb:waret	vform/2PlPastInd;
  sein+Verb:wär		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sein+Verb:wärst	vform/2SgPastKonj;
  sein+Verb:wärt	vform/2PlPastKonj;
  sein+Verb:wesen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON VAux.sein	! sein 
  sein+Verb+Aux		vform/Inf;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seiend	vform/PPres;
  sein+Verb+Aux:sei	vform/ImpSg;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seid	vform/ImpPl;		
  sein+Verb+Aux:bin	vform/1SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:sei	vform/13SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:bist	vform/2SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seist	vform/2SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seiest	vform/2SgPresKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:ist	vform/3SgPresInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:sind	vform/13PlPresInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seien	vform/13PlPresKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seid	vform/2PlPresInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:seiet	vform/2PlPresKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:war	vflex/PastIndStr;
  sein+Verb+Aux:warest	vform/2SgPastInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:waret	vform/2PlPastInd;
  sein+Verb+Aux:wär	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  sein+Verb+Aux:wärst	vform/2SgPastKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:wärt	vform/2PlPastKonj;
  sein+Verb+Aux:gewesen	vform/PPast;
